Vermont, session 2025-2026, H672.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 7 V.S.A. § 271 is amended to read:
§ 271. MANUFACTURER’S OR RECTIFIER’S LICENSE
* * *
(g) A licensed manufacturer of malt beverages may distribute an annual
total of not more than 5,000 barrels of the manufacturer’s malt beverages
directly to holders of first- or second-class licenses.
VT LEG #385104 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.672
2026 Page 2 of 2
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385104 v.1